Nebraska, session 109, LB519.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 83-4,114.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-4,114.02 (1) Before disciplinary measures are taken against an inmate
for drug or alcohol violations, an inmate may request and the department shall
provide independent confirmation testing of positive results of:
(a) Urinalysis urinalysis testing; or .
(b) Any screening test, field test, presumptive test, or spot test of an
item suspected of being or containing a contraband drug.
(2) If the confirmation test remains positive, the inmate shall may be
required to pay the cost of the confirmation test.
Sec. 2. Original section 83-4,114.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-1-